Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201776-1602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Self-Service Storage Facilities Act:

(1) Commercially reasonable sale means a sale that (a) is conducted at the self-service storage facility or on a publicly accessible web site that conducts lien sales and (b) is attended by at least three persons who appear personally, online, by telephone, or by any other method;

(2) Default means the failure to perform on time any obligation or duty set forth in a rental agreement;

(3) Electronic mail means an electronic message or an executable program or computer file that contains an image of a message that is transmitted between two or more computers or electronic terminals and includes electronic messages that are transmitted within or between computer networks;

(4) Emergency means any sudden, unexpected occurrence or circumstance at or near a self-service storage facility that requires immediate action to avoid injury to persons or property at or near the self-service storage facility, including, but not limited to, a fire;

(5) Last-known address means the postal address or electronic mail address provided by an occupant in a rental agreement or the postal address or electronic mail address provided by the occupant in a subsequent written notice of a change of address;

(6) Leased space means the individual storage space at a self-service storage facility which is rented to an occupant pursuant to a rental agreement;

(7) Occupant means a person entitled to the use of leased space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement or his or her successors or assigns;

(8) Operator means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a self-service storage facility or an agent or any other person authorized to manage the facility. Operator does not include a warehouseman if the warehouseman issues a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title for the personal property stored;

(9) Personal property means movable property not affixed to land. Personal property includes, but is not limited to, goods, wares, merchandise, motor vehicles, watercraft, household items, and furnishings;

(10) Property which has no commercial value means property offered for sale in a commercially reasonable sale that receives no bid or offer;

(11) Rental agreement means any written agreement or lease that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, or rules concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage facility;

(12) Self-service storage facility means any real property used for renting or leasing individual storage spaces in which the occupants customarily store and remove their own personal property on a self-service basis; and

(13) Verified mail means any method of mailing offered by the United States Postal Service that provides evidence of the mailing.

Laws 2017, LB492, § 2.